Utah statutes.
20A-6-304.   Regular general election -- Electronic ballots.

(1)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  the format and content of the electronic ballot is arranged in approximately the same order as paper ballots;

(b)  the titles of offices and the names of candidates are displayed in vertical columns or in a series of separate display screens;

(c)  the electronic ballot is of sufficient length to include, after the list of candidates:

(i)  the names of candidates for judicial offices and any other nonpartisan offices; and

(ii)  any ballot propositions submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection;

(d) (i)  a voting square or position is included where the voter may record a straight party ticket vote for all the candidates of one party by making a single selection; and

(ii)  the name of each political party listed in the straight party selection area includes the word "party" at the end of the party's name;

(e)  the tickets are displayed in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305;

(f)  the office titles are displayed above or at the side of the names of candidates so as to indicate clearly the candidates for each office and the number to be elected;

(g)  the party designation of each candidate is displayed adjacent to the candidate's name; and

(h)  if possible, all candidates for one office are grouped in one column or upon one display screen.

(2)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  proposed amendments to the Utah Constitution are displayed in accordance with Section 20A-6-107;

(b)  ballot propositions submitted to the voters are displayed in accordance with Section 20A-6-107; and

(c)  bond propositions that have qualified for the ballot are displayed under the title assigned to each bond proposition under Section 11-14-206.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2011 General Session

